Hawaii, session 2025, GM1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that youth and young
adults coramonly experience unemployment at higher rates than the
general population. Prolonged youth unemployment can have
profound negative impacts on the lifetime earnings and
well-being of individuals, and action is needed to provide
better work opportunities for Hawaii’s youth and young adults.
The legislature also finds that the State has set ambitious
goals in the areas of economic diversification, environmental
management, and energy self-sufficiency. An important element
of reaching these goals is investing in a workforce that is both
skilled and experienced in sustainability-related professions.
The legislature notes that the Civilian Conservation Corps,
a federal work relief program created during the Great
Depression, employed Americans for conservation projects of
local, state, and national benefit, providing opportunities for
displaced young adults. While the Civilian Conservation Corps
disbanded in 1942, the concept lives on through The Corps
2025-3419 HB316 CDl HMSO
1l■■nlnnllltlllSllHll

Page 2
H.B. NO. gj
C.D. 1
Network, a national association of service and conservation
corps that provide opportunities for young adults and veterans
to serve their communities and the environment.
The State also established the Hawaii youth conservation
corps, a program that provides young individuals with
opportunities in conservation on a smaller scale. This program
currently operates within the policies set out under chapter
193, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
The legislature recognizes that Act 9, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2020, appropriated funds designated for the State by the
federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act to
establish a workforce and training program that, among other
accomplishments, funded a short-term green jobs program in
partnership with the Hawaii-based nonprofit organization Kupu
Aina Corps (Kupu). Kupu’s partnership with conservation and
agriculture host sites enabled individuals to work in their own
communities while giving back to the State’s economy and
environment. Through this short-term program, over three
hundred fifty displaced workers and recent graduates were
matched with work and training opportunities across the State.
2025-3419 HB316 CDl HMSO 2
imiiiiiniiiniiiiinN

Page 3
H.B. NO. gS i
C.D. 1
The legislature further recognizes that Act 181, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2021, authorized the governor to designate the
department of land and natural resources as the administrator of
the State’s green jobs youth corps program and provided funding
for the administration of the program. In 2022, the legislature
amended the requirements for this program and provided
additional funding through Act 33, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022.
The legislature additionally finds that the green jobs
youth corps program is an important part of the State's strategy
to diversify the economy and reach its environmental and energy
self-sufficiency goals. In addition, this program invests in
building the human capital of young adults who are interested in
working in sustainability-related professions. The legislature
therefore finds great value in the continuation of the green
jobs youth corps program, which requires additional funding.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate
funds for the continuation of the green jobs youth corps
program.
SECTION 2, There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
2025-3419 HB316 CDl HMSO 2
HIIBIIIillllHIinilHI

Page 4
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the green jobs youth corps program; provided that,
notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of land
and natural resources and its partner or partners may obtain and
utilize federal or other outside funding for the purpose of
matching state funds provided for the green jobs youth corps
program.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3419 HB316 CDl HMSO
iiHiimiiitiiiiiiiiuia

316
H.B. NO.
X
(Zi

Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 316, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 316, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
108